Utah statutes.
78B-11-129.   Appeals.

(1)  An appeal may be taken from:

(a)  an order denying a motion to compel arbitration;

(b)  an order granting a motion to stay arbitration;

(c)  an order confirming or denying confirmation of an award;

(d)  an order modifying or correcting an award;

(e)  an order vacating an award without directing a rehearing; or

(f)  a final judgment entered pursuant to this chapter.

(2)  An appeal under this section must be taken as from an order or a judgment in a civil action.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

